Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2378.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The legislature finds that the fundamental rights of owning
property include the right of the owner to exclude others from entering or
remaining unlawfully on the property. The legislature further finds that
squatting, or the unauthorized entry into or remaining in a dwelling, is a
violation of the rights of property owners and is against the public interest.
The intent of this act is to ensure that squatting is considered a crime, to
adequately protect the rights of property owners, and to provide a timely
and effective mechanism for removing squatters while protecting the rights
of legitimate occupants.
Sec. 2. (a) The owner of a dwelling unit or the agent of the owner of a
dwelling unit may request the removal of an unauthorized person from the
dwelling unit by submitting an a notarized affidavit to the county sheriff a
law enforcement agency in the county where the dwelling unit is located
containing the following elements:
(1) The affiant is the owner of the dwelling unit or the agent of the
owner of the dwelling unit;
(2) a person has entered and is remaining unlawfully in the dwelling
unit;
(3) the person was not authorized to enter the dwelling unit;
(4) the person is not a tenant or a holdover tenant;
(5) the affiant has requested the unauthorized person to vacate the
dwelling unit and the person has not done so; and
(6) the unauthorized person is not an immediate family member of
the property owner.

HB 2378—Am. by HCW 2
(b) (1) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as defined in K.S.A.
58-2543, and amendments thereto.
(2) "Tenant" has the same meaning as defined in K.S.A. 58-2543, and
amendments thereto An affiant who knowingly provides a false
affidavit to a law enforcement agency under this section may be
charged with a class A nonperson misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. (a) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county sheriff applicable
law enforcement agency shall verify that the affiant is the record owner
of the dwelling unit or the authorized agent of the owner of the dwelling
unit and appears otherwise entitled to relief. Upon verification and after at
least 24 hours from receipt of the affidavit, the county sheriff a law
enforcement officer shall serve a notice on the unauthorized person to
vacate immediately the dwelling unit.
(b) Service may be accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to
any unauthorized person occupying the dwelling or by posting notice on
the front door or entrance of the dwelling unit. The county sheriff law
enforcement agency shall also attempt to verify the identities of all
persons occupying the dwelling and note the identities on the return of
service.
(c) The county sheriff law enforcement agency may arrest any
person found in the dwelling unit for trespass, burglary, theft, damage to
property or any other criminal act, or for an outstanding arrest warrant.
(d) The county sheriff law enforcement officer may charge a fee of
not more than $50 to process an affidavit filed pursuant to this act.
Sec. 4. (a) The affiant owner of the dwelling unit or the agent of the
owner of the dwelling unit shall provide notice at the dwelling unit
notifying the unauthorized person that such person has no right to occupy
the dwelling unit and must vacate immediately. The notice shall include
the street address of the county sheriff's office law enforcement agency
where the affidavit will be delivered. A copy of the notice with the date
and time of delivery shall be attached to the affidavit.
(b) An affiant who knowingly provides a false affidavit to the county
sheriff may be charged with a class A nonperson misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. No county sheriff's department law enforcement agency or
such agency's deputies or employees or political subdivision of the state
may be held liable for any action or omission made in good faith pursuant
to this act. A county sheriff's law enforcement officer is not liable to an
unauthorized person individual or any other party for loss, destruction or
damage of property.
Sec. 6. A person may bring a civil cause of action for wrongful
removal under this act against the affiant owner of the dwelling unit or
agent of the owner of the dwelling unit. An person harmed by a wrongful
removal under this act may have the possession of the dwelling unit

HB 2378—Am. by HCW 3
restored and may recover actual costs and damages, as well as punitive
damages of triple the fair market rent of the dwelling, plus court costs and
reasonable attorney fees.
Sec. 7. (a) Sections 1 through 7, and amendments thereto, shall be
known as the removal of squatters act.
(b) As used in this act:
(1) "Dwelling unit" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 58-2543,
and amendments thereto, except that "dwelling unit" includes
commercial property and mobile homes.
(2) "Immediate family member" means spouse, child, grandchild
of any degree, parent, mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandparent of
any degree, brother, brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law, half-brother,
half-sister, uncle, aunt, nephew or niece, whether biological, step or
adoptive.
(3) "Law enforcement agency" and "law enforcement officer"
mean the same as defined in K.S.A. 22-4606, and amendments thereto.
(4) "Squatter" means a person occupying a dwelling who is not
entitled to occupy the dwelling under a lease or rental agreement nor
authorized by a tenant to occupy the dwelling. "Squatter" does not include
a tenant who holds over in periodic tenancy.
(5) "Tenant" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 58-2543, and
amendments thereto.
(c) Occupancy by a squatter is excluded from the residential landlord
tenant act and the removal of a squatter shall not require the use of an
eviction action under such act.
Sec. 8. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.